Georgia statutes. TITLE 7 Banking And Finance
PART 2 Credit Union Conservators

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 344, § 19/HB 184, redesignated former Part 2 of Article 3 of Chapter 1, which consisted of Code Sections 7-1-650 through 7-1-670, as Part 3 of Article 3 of Chapter 1.

7-1-640.
Appointment of conservators; authority; reporting requirement.

The department may, in its discretion, appoint itself or a third party as conservator for a credit union when the credit union:

Is insolvent or in an unsafe and unsound condition;

Has suspended payment of obligations without authority of law;

Has violated its articles or an order, statute, rule, or regulation and the department determines that its continued control of its own affairs threatens injury to the public, the financial community, members, or creditors; or

Requests the department, by its board of directors, to appoint a conservator for the benefit of members or creditors.

The right of the department to act as conservator of a credit union shall be in addition to all other rights, remedies, and powers of the department.

The department may, in its discretion, before or after taking conservatorship, petition the principal court of a credit union for the appointment of a conservator pursuant to Code Section 7-1-643.

The conservator shall conduct the business of the credit union and take steps toward the removal of the causes and conditions that have necessitated the appointment of a conservator. The conservator shall be immediately authorized to:

Assume all powers of the members, directors, officers, and committees of the credit union;

Take charge of the credit union and all of its property, books, records, and effects;

Take any and all actions to operate the credit union in its own name or to conserve its assets as directed by the department, including, but not limited to, terminating or adopting any executory contracts to which the credit union may be a party;

Take all necessary measures to preserve, protect, and recover any assets or property of the credit union, including any claim or cause of action belonging to or which may be asserted by the credit union, and administer the same in its own name as conservator;

File, prosecute, and defend any suit that has been filed or may be filed by or against the credit union that is deemed by the conservator to be necessary to protect all interested parties or any property affected thereby;

Exercise all rights, powers, and duties conferred on the credit union by this chapter; and

Take any other actions that are necessary or incidental to carrying out the role of conservator.

The conservator shall make reports to the department from time to time as may be required by the department.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-640

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 344, § 19/HB 184.

7-1-641.
Certificate of appointment.

The department shall, immediately after appointing a conservator, file with the principal court of a credit union a certificate to be known as a certificate of appointment.

The certificate of appointment shall set forth the basis for the department’s appointment of a conservator and state the name of the conservator.

If the department does not appoint a conservator prior to the date of the filing of the certificate of appointment or it appoints a new or additional conservator, the department shall file a supplement to the certificate of appointment setting forth such facts.

The certificate of appointment and any supplement will be listed in the judgment index in the name of the credit union as defendant and the department as plaintiff.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-641

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 344, § 19/HB 184.

7-1-642.
Costs; immunity.

All costs incident to conservatorship will be charged against the assets of the credit union to be allowed and paid as the department may determine.

The department, its employees, and third parties acting as conservators are not subject to liability for actions related to a conservatorship, including, but not limited to, the appointment of a conservator, and no department funds shall be required to be expended on behalf of the credit union, its creditors, employees, or members, or any other party or entity.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-642

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 344, § 19/HB 184.

7-1-643.
Appointment of department as conservator.

Whenever any court, upon the initiation of the department or other person entitled by law to institute such proceedings, determines that a conservator should be appointed, for any reason whatsoever, it shall appoint the department as conservator. Except as provided in subsection (c) of this Code section, such court shall appoint only the department as conservator of a credit union.

When appointed conservator by a court, the department shall serve in the same manner and with the same limitations and shall have the same rights, powers, and duties as if it were to become conservator without appointment by a court pursuant to Code Section 7-1-640. No court shall impose upon the department as conservator any duties or restrictions in conflict with this chapter.

In any proceeding for the appointment of a conservator of a credit union whose shares are insured by a public body of the United States, the court may, upon the recommendation of the department, whether or not the department is a party, appoint such public body as conservator.

If a public body accepts the appointment, it shall have all the rights, powers, and duties of the department as conservator under this chapter and all the rights, powers, and duties as conferred by other applicable law.

The posting of a bond shall not be required when a public body acts as conservator.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-643

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 344, § 19/HB 184.

7-1-644.
Bond.

If the department appoints a conservator other than a public body of the United States that insures the shares of a credit union, an employee of the department, or the department itself, the conservator and any assistants shall provide a bond, payable to the credit union and executed by a surety company authorized to do business in this state.

The amount of such bond shall be approved by the department and be in an amount to ensure the faithful discharge of duties in connection with the conservatorship and take into account the amount of money under the control of the conservator.

The cost of such bond shall be paid from the assets of the credit union.

Any person injured by a breach of the conditions on such bond has a right to bring a civil remedy in order to seek to collect on such bond.

A bond of a credit union shall be deemed satisfactory if the department determines it covers a conservator and any assistants.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-644

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 344, § 19/HB 184.

7-1-645.
Show cause requirement; appointment of receiver; role of conservator; limitation on court’s role.

No later than ten days after the date a conservator is appointed pursuant to Code Section 7-1-640, a credit union may apply to its principal court for an order requiring the department to show cause why it should not be enjoined from continuing the conservatorship.

If at any time the department determines that a credit union is not in a condition to continue business under a conservator, the department may appoint a receiver in accordance with Code Section 7-1-150.

A conservator may conduct the business of a credit union and take steps toward the removal of the causes and conditions that have necessitated the appointment of a conservator until such time as:

The department shall permit such credit union to continue business subject to such terms and conditions as may be imposed by the department;

Such credit union is liquidated in accordance with the provisions of subsection (b) of this Code section; or

Otherwise ordered by the principal court of such credit union.

Except as provided in this chapter, no court shall take any action, except at the request of the department, to restrain or affect the exercise of powers or functions of a conservator.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-645

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 344, § 19/HB 184.